Ohio, session 136, HB551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.971 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.971. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the intersection of the roads known as United States route two hundred fifty and McCauley drive, in the municipal corporation of Uhrichsville, in Tuscarawas county, shall be known as the "Dale McCauley Memorial Intersection." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers in the intersection indicating its name.